src/propernoun-smj-morph.txt
LEXICON GEAVNNISDECL_PLC-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ GEAVNNISUCASE_PLC-ORG ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !

!LEXICON GEAVNNISUCASE
! +Sg+Nom:Q1s K ;
! +Sg+Nom:Q1s RHyph ;     
! +Ess:Q1n K ;
! +Sg+Ill:X4j K ;
! +Ess:X4n K ;
! +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
! +Sg+Gen:X4 RHyph ;      
! +Sg+Acc:X4v K ;
! +Sg+Ine:X4n K ;
! +Sg+Ela:X4s K ;
! +Pl+Nom:X4 K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X4j K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X4j RHyph ;     
! +Pl+Acc:X4jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:X4jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:X4jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:X4js K ;
! +Pl+Com:X4j K ;
! +Sg+Com:X4X5jn K ;

LEXICON GEAVNNISUCASE_PLC-ORG
 +Sg+Nom:Q1s K ;
 +Sg+Nom:Q1s RHyph ;     
 +Ess:Q1n K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X4j K ;
 +Ess:X4n K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4 RHyph ;      
 +Sg+Acc:X4v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:X4n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:X4s K ;
! +Pl+Nom:X4 K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X4j K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X4j RHyph ;     
! +Pl+Acc:X4jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:X4jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:X4jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:X4js K ;
! +Pl+Com:X4j K ;
 +Sg+Com:X4X5jn K ;



LEXICON VARGGAT-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> VARGGATDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Q1 VUONAK ;

!LEXICON VARGGAT-obj
! +N+Prop+Obj:%> VARGGATDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Obj+Sg+Gen:%>Q1 VUONAK ;



LEXICON VARGGAT-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> VARGGATDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Org+Sg+Gen:%>Q1 VUONAK ;



!LEXICON VARGGAT
! +N+Prop:%> VARGGATDECL ;

LEXICON VARGGATDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ VARGGATUCASE ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !

LEXICON VARGGATUCASE
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:Q1 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q1j K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q1j RHyph ;     
 +Pl+Acc:Q1jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:Q1jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:Q1jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:Q1js K ;
 +Pl+Com:Q1j K ;
! +Sg+Com:Q1X5jn K ;

!LEXICON ALEUHTAT-org
! +N+Prop+Org@U.Cap.Obl@:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ALEUHTATDECL ;
!  LASJ ; !SUB
 
LEXICON ALEUHTAT-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc@U.Cap.Obl@:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ALEUHTATDECL ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%> VUONAK ;

LEXICON ALEUHTATDECL
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;
 +Pl+Gen:j RHyph ;     
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;
 +Pl+Com:j K ;
! +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 

LEXICON SULLOT-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc@U.Cap.Obl@:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ SULLOTDECL ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%> VUONAK ;
 
!LEXICON SULLOT
! +N+Prop:%> SULLOTDECL ;
 
LEXICON SULLOTDECL
 +Ess:Q3n K ;
 +Ess:X4n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X4j K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X4j RHyph ;     
 +Pl+Acc:X4jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X4jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:X4jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:X4js K ;
 +Pl+Com:X4j K ;
! +Sg+Com:X4X5jn K ;

LEXICON EATNAMAT-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc@U.Cap.Obl@:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ EATNAMATDECL ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !
 
LEXICON EATNAMAT-org
+N+Prop+Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ EATNAMATDECL ;


!LEXICON EATNAMAT
! +N+Prop:%> EATNAMATDECL ;

LEXICON EATNAMATDECL
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij RHyph ;             
 +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ij K ;
 
 
 
